Hawaii statutes.
§453-12 Perjury. Any person who
wilfully and knowingly makes under oath any false statement in connection with
any such proceeding before the board shall be guilty of perjury and shall be
subject to the penalty prescribed by law for perjury. Whenever the board is
satisfied that the witness has committed perjury in any proceeding before the
board, it shall report the same to the prosecuting officer of the county in
which the perjury took place, who shall prosecute the witness for perjury. [L
1917, c 61, §3; RL 1925, §1033; am imp L 1932 1st, c 13, pt of §1; RL 1935,
§1212; RL 1945, §2511; am L 1947, c 201, pt of §1; RL 1955, §64-11; am L Sp
1959 2d, c 1, §19; HRS §453-12; am L 1969, c 257, §10]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next